Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive

Executive Order No. 3-1
(No. 13-69) [Planning and Community Services Agency.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-2
(No. 44-72) [Administrative Districts.

WHEREAS, by the terms of No. 74 of the Acts of 1971, authority was granted to the Governor to make changes in the organization of the administrative districts of the State; and

WHEREAS, such changes are to be proposed by executive order and submitted to both houses of the General Assembly for consideration;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Deane C. Davis, by virtue of the authority in me vested as Governor, and considering certain changes to be necessary for efficient administration, do hereby propose:

That paragraph (1) of chapter 65, Title 3, Vermont Statutes Annotated, § 4001, be amended as follows:

District 1: Benson, Brandon, Castleton, Chittenden, Clarendon, Danby, Fair Haven, Hubbardton, Ira, Mendon, Middletown Springs, Mt. Holly, Mt. Tabor, Pawlet, Pittsford, Poultney, Proctor, Rutland City, Rutland Town, Sherburne, Shrewsbury, Sudbury, Tinmouth,
Wallingford, Wells, West Haven, and West Rutland.

That the following paragraph (8) be added to § 4001 of chapter 65, Title 3, Vermont Statutes Annotated:

(8) District 8: Arlington, Bennington, Dorset, Glastenbury, Landgrove, Manchester, Peru, Pownal, Rupert, Sandgate, Shaftsbury, Stamford, Sunderland, and Woodford.

The district offices designated under § 4002, shall be amended as follows:

District 1: Rutland City

District 2: Brattleboro and Springfield

District 3: Hartford

District 4: Burlington City and Middlebury

District 5: Barre City and Morristown

District 6: St. Albans City

District 7: St. Johnsbury and Newport

District 8: Bennington

The designation of sub-district offices under § 4003 shall be eliminated.

Dated January 12, 1972.

Executive Order No. 3-3
(No. 14-78) [Interagency Committee on Rules and Administrative Procedures.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-52 (codified as Executive Order No. 04-10), dated July 2, 2010.

Executive Order No. 3-4
(No. 21-78) [Transfer of Utility Driver Position From Agency of Human Services to Purchasing Division, Agency of Administration.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-5
(No. 32-79) [Transfer of Clerk B Position From Office of Secretary of State to Division of Public Records, Agency of Administration.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-6
(No. 71-83) [Agencies Required To File Proposed Administrative Rules With Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 1985.

Executive Order No. 3-7
(No. 74-83) [Intergovernmental Consultation System.

Rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-33 (codified as Executive Order No. 13-96), dated July 17, 1996.

Executive Order No. 3-8
(No. 83-84) [Abolition of Certain Boards, Commissions, Councils and Other Bodies.

WHEREAS, the Governor has the power under 3 V.S.A., chapter 41 to effect change in the organization of the executive branch by means of Executive Order, and

WHEREAS, various Governors over the years have used Executive Orders to establish boards, commissions, councils and similar bodies for varying purposes, and

WHEREAS, a number of these bodies have been inactive for several years, have been superseded by similar statutory bodies, or have otherwise ceased to serve the purpose for which they were established, and

WHEREAS, an attorney general’s opinion has determined that Executive Orders continue in effect indefinitely unless limited in duration by their own terms or because they have a transitory effect, or until revoked, rescinded or superseded, and

WHEREAS, there is need to officially abolish those bodies established by Executive Order which have outlived their usefulness yet remain in existence,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby revoke and rescind the following Executive Orders and the bodies established thereby:

Executive Order #10 dated July 9, 1969 (Governor’s Commission on Student Affairs)

Executive Order #10a dated December 11, 1970 (Governor’s Commission on Student Affairs)

Executive Order #18 dated January 9, 1970 (Governor’s Council for Student Interns in State Government)

Executive Order #3 dated November 7, 1973 (Vermont Energy Policy Advisory Board)

Executive Order #37 dated May 13, 1974 (Voluntarism Advisory Council)

Executive Order #17 dated July 15, 1975 (Youth Camp Advisory Council)

Executive Order #18 dated July 22, 1975 (Youth Camp Advisory Council)

Executive Order #19 dated August 5, 1975 (Governor’s Commission on the Administration of Justice)

Executive Order #20 dated September 15, 1975 (Advisory Committee for Economic Development Planning)

Executive Order #31 dated June 9, 1976 (Security and Privacy Committee)

Executive Order #34 dated August 31, 1976 (Vermont Epilepsy Commission)

Executive Order #8 dated September 1, 1977 (Vermont Metric Coordinating Council)

Executive Order #12 dated December 1, 1977 (Vermont State Nuclear Advisory Panel)

Executive Order #22 dated September 14, 1978 (Inter Agency Craft Council)

Executive Order #37 dated August 15, 1979 (Vermont Certified Public Manager Board)

Executive Order #39 dated September 11, 1979 (Vermont Statewide Waste Treatment Planning Board)

Executive Order #45 dated March 12, 1980 (Governor’s Commission on Energy Independence)

Executive Order #47 dated April 1, 1980 (Vermont State Police Advisory Commission)

Dated August 31, 1984.

Executive Order No. 3-9
(No. 19-86) [Agencies Required To File Proposed or Emergency Administrative Rules With Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 1987.

Executive Order No. 3-10
(No. 20-86) [Governor’s Commission on Women.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05(codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-11
(No. 35-87) [Abolition of Certain Departments and Divisions and Establishment of the Department of General Services and Department of Finance and Management.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-12
(No. 36-87) [Transfer of Certain Positions and Appropriations From Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Water Resources to Department of Labor and Industry.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-13
(No. 45-87) [Transfer of Certain Positions, Functions and Appropriations of Certain Agencies and the Central Support Services Revolving Fund to Department of General Services.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-14
(No. 56-88) [Agencies Required To File Proposed and Emergency Administrative Rules With Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules; Study of Scope of and Limitations on Rulemaking.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 04-10 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-52), dated July 2, 2010.

Executive Order No. 3-15
(No. 70-89) [Abolition of Office on Aging and Transfer of Functions of Certain Divisions to and Establishment of Department of Rehabilitation and Aging.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 10-09 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-50), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 3-16
(No. 1-91) [Transfer of Duties and Director of Office of Economic Opportunity From Agency of Human Services to Department of Prevention, Assistance, Transition, and Health Access.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-17
(No. 2-91) [Transfer of Duties Relating to Public Drinking Water Program and Positions and Equipment of Division of Environmental Health From Department of Health to Department of Environmental Conservation.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-18
(No. 3-91) [Executive Code of Ethics.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 8-91 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-19), dated October 3, 1991.

Executive Order No. 3-19
(No. 8-91) [Executive Code of Ethics.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 04-00 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-40), dated June 13, 2000.

Executive Order No. 3-20
(No. 15-91) [Recognition and Encouragement of Vermont Minority/Women Business Enterprises Partnership.

WHEREAS, the Vermont Minority/Women Business Enterprises Partnership was mandated to develop a plan to facilitate equal access and maximum opportunity to participate in state contracting procedures for Minority/Women Business Enterprises (M/WBEs) and
to ensure nondiscrimination in state contracting programs; and

WHEREAS, the plan presented by the Partnership is the result of deliberations that included consideration of the methods for collecting statewide data and certifying M/WBEs; and

WHEREAS, the plan addressed the provision of technical assistance and outreach programs to broaden the participation of these enterprises in the state’s contracting process; and

WHEREAS, through consultation with technical experts, both in and out of government, the implementation plan is achievable within existing resources of State Agencies and Departments;

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order the following actions:

Agencies and Departments of state government shall adopt and implement the following policy:

The State of Vermont recognizes the important contributions and vital impact which small businesses have on the state’s economy. In this regard, the state prescribes to a free and open bidding process that affords all businesses equal access and opportunity
to compete for state contracts for goods and services. The state also recognizes the existence of businesses owned by minorities and women and directs all state agencies and departments to make a good faith effort to encourage
these firms to compete for state contracts.

The Agency of Development and Community Affairs using existing staff will act as liaison to minority/women businesses.

Data on women and minority businesses will be integrated into the state’s vendor list and into the list of awarded contracts.

The Purchasing Department will provide outreach to M/WBEs by conducting seminars on “Contracting with State Government.”

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated December 11, 1991.

Executive Order No. 3-21
(No. 101-91) [Abolition of Certain Boards, Commissions, Councils and Other Bodies.

WHEREAS, the Governor has the authority to issue Executive Orders to ensure efficiency and effectiveness in the management of state government; and

WHEREAS, several Executive Orders have been developed since January 10, 1985, to support the Governor’s policy and program management actions; and

WHEREAS, the objectives of some of the Executive Orders have been achieved; and

WHEREAS, it is desirable to rescind the Executive Orders that are no longer necessary;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Madeleine M. Kunin, Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby rescind the following Executive Orders:

Executive Order #1 dated February 21, 1985 (Job Skills Cabinet)

Executive Order #3 dated April 18, 1985 (Higher Education Planning Commission)

Executive Order #5 dated May 16, 1985 (Vermont Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations)

Executive Order #8 dated June 19, 1985 (Asbestos Health Hazard Control Abatement Program)

Executive Order #9 dated June 20, 1985 (Burlington International Airport Special Study Group)

Executive Order #11 dated July 10, 1985 (Special Task Force on On-Site Waste Disposal Technology)

Executive Order #13 dated August 2, 1985 (Hunger Task Force)

Executive Order #14 dated August 2, 1985 (Vermont Telecommunications Commission)

Executive Order #16 dated October 10, 1985 (Sentencing Study Commission)

Executive Order #17 dated February 6, 1986 (Solid Waste Management Advisory Committee)

Executive Order #18 dated February 27, 1986 (Oil Overcharge Task Force)

Executive Order #27 dated July 24, 1986 (Oil Overcharge Task Force)

Executive Order #29 dated August 4, 1986 (Sentencing Study Commission)

Executive Order #39 dated February 10, 1987 (Telecommunications Oversight Committee)

Executive Order #40 dated February 11, 1987 (Special Task Force on Transportation Systems)

Executive Order #43 dated April 16, 1987 (Emergency Response Commission)

Executive Order #43a dated June 22, 1987 (Emergency Response Commission)

Executive Order #44 dated July 2, 1987 (Special Solid Waste Implementation Task Force)

Executive Order #46 dated July 13, 1987 (Special Commission on Public School Governance)

Executive Order #47 dated July 14, 1987 (Special Commission on Special Education)

Executive Order #50 dated September 22, 1987 (Commission on Vermont’s Future: Guidelines for Growth)

Executive Order #57 dated January 9, 1988 (Administrative Law Task Force)

Executive Order #67 dated September 6, 1988 (Commission on Educating Vermont’s Workforce)

Executive Order #69 dated November 22, 1988 (Poet Laureate Panel)

Executive Order #72 dated March 3, 1989 (Committee to Study Proposed Vermont Sports Entertainment Complex)

Executive Order #73 dated April 4, 1989 (Committee to Study Vermont Higher Education)

Executive Order #80 dated October 24, 1989 (Fish and Wildlife Commission)

Executive Order #83 dated January 12, 1990 (Reorganization of the Public Service Department)

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated January, 1991.

Executive Order No. 3-22
(No. 3A-92) [Recognition, Structure and Powers of Vermont Center for Geographic Information and Transfer of Functions from Geographic Information Services.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-23
(No. 01-93) [Reversal of Reorganization of Agency of Administration.

WHEREAS, the Governor has the authority to issue Executive Orders to ensure efficiency and effectiveness in the management of state government; and

WHEREAS, it is desirable to rescind Executive Orders that are no longer necessary.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby rescind the following actions taken in Executive Order No. 4-91 (Reorganization of Agency of Administration) dated January 31, 1991:

The redesignation and change in duties of the Deputy Secretary of Administration;

The change in reporting of the Commissioner of Finance and Management;

The redesignation and change in duties of the Commissioner of the Department of General Services.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall supersede any previous orders or directives of this office to the extent inconsistent herewith.

Dated January 10, 1993.

Executive Order No. 3-24
(No. 08-93) [Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 06-06 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated October 10, 2006.

Executive Order No. 3-25
(No. 13-93) [Governor’s Council on Affirmative Action; Creation of Program.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 14-98 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-37), dated November 18, 1999.

Executive Order No. 3-26
(No. 01-94) [Abolition of Department of Taxes and Creation of Department of Revenue.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 3-27
(No. 05-94) [Vermont Developmental Disabilities Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 05-07 (codified as Executive Order No. 33-16), dated August 14, 2007.

Executive Order No. 3-28
(No. 11-94) [Reimbursement for Members of Governor’s Commission on Women.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 06-05 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-46), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 3-29
(No. 12-94) [Telecommunications Technology Council of Vermont.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 15-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 30-7), dated September 24, 2003.

Executive Order No. 3-30
(No. 07-95) [Administrative Districts.

WHEREAS, Vermont state government can realize savings by consolidating management, information and space; by coordinating state technical services; and by consolidating the public’s access to information and other assistance; and

WHEREAS, Vermont state government must also collaborate to avoid inconsistencies and redundancies among state and local agencies and departments; and

WHEREAS, 3 V.S.A. Section 4001 establishes eight administrative districts for state government.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby direct all executive branch agencies and departments of Vermont state government to:

• Align the geographic boundaries of their administrative districts to conform with the statutorily prescribed eight administrative districts.

• Reduce management and overhead structures in agencies and departments within the eight administrative service districts by combining these districts where appropriate or by sharing management resources across agencies and departments.

• Work collaboratively with communities and service providers within these districts to deliver quality and cost-effective services.

• Enhance client service delivery systems to geographically isolated regions of the state through the use of satellite offices.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 4, 1995.

Executive Order No. 3-31
(No. 08-95) [Abolition of Certain Boards, Commissions, Councils and Other Bodies.

WHEREAS, Governors over the years have established boards, commissions, and councils for various purposes by Executive Order; and

WHEREAS, the members appointed to these bodies have worked diligently to complete the tasks assigned to them; and

WHEREAS, a number of these bodies have completed their work and been inactive for a period of years, or have been superseded by similar statutory bodies, or have ceased to serve the purpose for which they were established;

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby revoke and rescind the following Executive Orders:

Executive Order #20-78 dated August 23, 1978 (State-Local Intergovernmental Relations)

Executive Order #85-90 dated March 15, 1990 (Vermont-Minority/Women Business Enterprises Partnership)

Executive Order #94-90 dated October 5, 1990 (Vermont Municipal Advisory Committee)

Executive Order #09-93 dated June 24, 1995 (Vermont Partnership for Economic Progress) Superseded by statute

Executive Order #16-78 dated June 15, 1978 (Agriculture Advisory Board)

Executive Order #52-80 dated September 25, 1980 (Agricultural Lands Review Board)

Executive Order #60-81 dated May 20, 1981 (Changes in Membership of Agriculture Advisory Board)

Executive Order #7-85 dated June 11, 1985 (Agriculture Advisory Board)

Executive Order #76-89 dated June 22, 1989 (Vermont-Quebec Joint Commission)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #90-90 dated April 27, 1990 (Export Advisory Council)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #93-90 dated September 1, 1990 (Task Force for the Protection of Consumers of Petroleum Products)

Executive Order #5-73 dated February 22, 1973 (State Planning Office)

Executive Order #63-88 dated March 29, 1988 (Advisory Council on Technology)

Executive Order #79-89 dated October 23, 1989 (Development of Comprehensive Energy Plan and Creation and Duties of State Agency Task Force on Energy)

Executive Order #66-82 dated April 12, 1982 (Delinquency Prevention Coordinating Council)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #10-85 dated July 1, 1985 (Justice and Victims Assistance Council)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #86-90 dated April 5, 1990 (Bail Amendment Task Force)

Executive Order #85-84 dated November 30, 1984 (Commission on Child Support)

Executive Order #78-89 dated August 22, 1989 (Holocaust Human Rights Education Committee)

Executive Order #96-90 dated October 19, 1990 (Advisory Panel on State-University Relations)

Executive Order # 26-79 dated January 29, 1979 (Alcohol and Drug Abuse Council)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #59-81 dated April 8, 1981 (Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #69-83 dated January 25, 1983 (Special Cabinet for Prevention, Education and Treatment of Alcohol Abuse)

Executive Order #49-87 dated August 19, 1987 (Biomedical Ethics Advisory Panel)

Executive Order #87-90 dated April 5, 1990 (Governor’s Commission on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #5-91 dated March 6, 1991 (Vermont Blue Ribbon Commission on Health)

Executive Order #31-86 dated October 9, 1986 (Vermont Fire and Burn Prevention Council)

Executive Order #27-79 dated January, 1979 (Creation of Employment and Training Services Task Force)

Executive Order #43-79 dated December 18, 1979 (Continuation of Employment and Training Services Task Force)

Executive Order #54-81 dated January 13, 1981 (Occupational Information Coordinating Committee)

Executive Order #75-83 dated October 21, 1983 (Advisory Committee on Employment of the Handicapped)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #2-85 dated April 15, 1985 (Development Cabinet)

Executive Order #88-90 dated April 5, 1990 (Vermont Education and Training 2000 Implementation Committee)

Executive Order #05-93 dated March 9, 1993 (Vermont Human Resources Investment Council)

Executive Order #95-90 (no date) (Vermont Columbus Quincentenary Commission)

Executive Order #2-73 dated January 12, 1973 (Advisory Rate Setting committee)

Executive Order #6-92 dated May 12, 1992 (Governor’s Blue Ribbon Commission on Educational and Municipal Financing Reform)

Executive Order #2-73 dated January 12, 1973 (Advisory Rate Setting Committee)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #30-71 dated January 14, 1971 (Advisory Rate Setting Committee)—Superseded by statute

Executive Order #4-73 dated January 15, 1973 (Office of Child Development)—Abolished by Executive Order #2-77

Executive Order #23-78 dated September 14, 1978 (1122 Appellate Review Board)

Executive Order #37-87 dated January 23, 1987 (Governor’s Task Force for the Prevention of Teenage Pregnancy)

Executive Order #61-88 dated March 23, 1988 (Continuation of Governor’s Task Force for the Prevention of Teenage Pregnancy)

Executive Order #11-91 dated November 7, 1991 (Commission on Volunteers)—Superseded by Executive Order #16-93

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated December 28, 1995.

Executive Order No. 3-32
(No. 01-96A) [Transfer of Certain Positions and Investments from Agency of Transportation to Department of Public Safety.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 02-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 19-4), dated March 20, 2003.

Executive Order No. 3-33
(No. 13-96) [Transfer of Functions and Responsibilities from Agency of Administration, Division of State Buildings to Various Agencies.

WHEREAS, Executive Order #74 was issued September 23, 1983; and

WHEREAS, the functions and responsibilities of this Executive Order are being carried out by various agencies.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby revoke and rescind Executive Order #74 dated September 23, 1983.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated July 17, 1996.

Executive Order No. 3-34
(No. 05-98) [Establishment of Blue Ribbon Commission on State Government Performance and Work Force Needs.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 15, 1999.

Executive Order No. 3-35
(No. 09-98) [Vermont Commission on National and Community Service.

Superseded by Executive Order 02-09 (codified as Executive Order No. 33-18), dated January 21, 2009.

Executive Order No. 3-36
(No. 11-98) [Year 2000 Remediation.

Superseded by Executive Order 5-99 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-38), dated May 11, 1999.

Executive Order No. 3-37
(No. 14-98) [Affirmative Action.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 09-02 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-43), dated August 20, 2002.

Executive Order No. 3-38
(No. 05-99) [Year 2000 Remediation.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 2001.

Executive Order No. 3-39
(No. 01-00) [Governor’s Development Cabinet.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 03-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-44), dated April 11, 2003.

Executive Order No. 3-40
(No. 04-00) [Executive Code of Ethics.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-45), dated September 13, 2003.

Executive Order No. 3-41
(No. 02-02) [Establishment of the Governor’s Children and Youth Cabinet.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2010.

Executive Order No. 3-42
(No. 08-02) [Interagency Executive Resource Planning Team Established.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2005

Executive Order No. 3-43
(No. 09-02) [Establishment of the Governor’s Workforce Equity and Diversity Council.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 3-59 (codified as Executive Order No. 10-13), dated December 31, 2013.

Executive Order No. 3-44
(No. 03-03) [Governor’s Jobs Cabinet.

WHEREAS, Vermont’s economy must be able to thrive amid ever-increasing competition on the regional, national, and international levels; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s economy faces competition from larger, more diverse economies; and

WHEREAS, Vermonters are deeply concerned about good paying job opportunities; and

WHEREAS, State government must work aggressively to retain jobs and pursue job creation opportunities consistent with Vermont values; and

WHEREAS, a good job advances self-sufficiency, independence, dignity, opportunity and the quality of life in our State; and

WHEREAS, State government must work in tandem with the private sector to achieve an economic environment conducive to job creation.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish the Governor’s Jobs Cabinet:

The Jobs Cabinet shall consist of representatives from State agencies and departments and shall include representatives from outside state government. The State members shall include the Development Cabinet and the Commissioners of the Departments of
Labor and Industry, Employment and Training, and Public Service; the Manager of the Vermont Economic Development Authority; the Chancellor of the Vermont State Colleges or his or her designee; and the President of the University of
Vermont or his or her designee. There shall be thirteen non-State members appointed by the Governor to serve for terms of three years. The initial appointments of the non-State members shall include four one-year terms, four two-year
terms and five three-year terms. The Governor shall appoint the Chair. The Jobs Cabinet may, at its discretion, establish inter-agency work groups to support its mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of state government.

Administrative support to the Cabinet shall be provided by the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. Public members may receive reimbursement of expenses in attending Cabinet meetings and may receive a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
. The Jobs Cabinet shall meet at the call of the Chair to carry out the following responsibilities:

1) Work collaboratively to identify and meet the needs of job generators and remove impediments to job growth whenever practicable.

2) Open dialogue and establish strategic partnerships among government and key organizations to achieve the goal of greater job creation. The Jobs Cabinet and individual state agencies may refer specific job development projects that present complex and
unique issues or require interagency coordination among state agencies and departments to the Chair. The Chair may establish a working group consisting of the State members for review and development of a plan to coordinate the state
agencies involved and resolve interagency conflicts, if any, to insure a coordinated and common sense approach.

3) Maintain an ongoing review of the state’s permitting processes and make recommendations that will assist business and housing to grow responsibly within a regulatory scheme that is fair, predictable, expedient, and cost-conscious. The Chair, in his
or her sole discretion, may refer any proposed project that will create additional jobs through expansion or location in Vermont to a working group consisting of State members for review. The working group may, to the extent practicable
and according to applicable laws, identify those aspects of the project where assistance in coordinating interagency communication, permitting or regulatory processes would assist review of the project in an efficient, reasonable and
timely fashion. The Chair, in his or her sole discretion, may refer a job development project to the Jobs Cabinet that has failed or chosen not to expand or locate in Vermont for review and identification of factors, including but
not limited to, infrastructure needs, state workforce deficiencies, and regulatory requirements, that contributed to the decision not to expand or locate in Vermont. The working group shall report to the full Jobs Cabinet a summary
of the projects it has considered and the factors identified as significant to the decision.

4) Remove barriers to and develop incentives for critical infrastructure investment in the State that is conducive to job creation such as broadband, wireless and power.

5) Facilitate small business advocacy forums in each region of the state to create an inventory of the needs of small business, including but not limited to government assistance.

6) Research programs in other states, particularly competitors in the Northeast, to identify Vermont’s opportunities and weaknesses relative to those states, recommend where Vermont should focus its efforts, and develop strategies to improve Vermont’s
competitive position in those areas.

7) Research and closely monitor national and international business trends to help Vermont’s economic development strategy stay ahead of its competitors. Identify emerging markets or potential growth areas such as exporting, technology, biotech, and engineering
and design appropriate recruiting strategies for those industry sectors.

8) Proactively seek to retain existing Vermont businesses and encourage job growth by developing networks for marketing and purchasing while creating links to other businesses for service and collaborative action.

9) Create and support a culture of entrepreneurship where new enterprise and innovation, especially within the high-tech industry, require private capital to grow and thrive.

10) Continuously seek ways to capitalize on Vermont’s key natural resources such as granite, wood, marble and agriculture with substantial consideration to value added products.

11) Encourage the creation, rehabilitation, and preservation of housing that is affordable to working Vermonters.

12) Encourage the reuse of buildings, manufacturing facilities and other infrastructure in our traditional downtown areas.

13) Assure that the State’s efforts, and those of this Jobs Cabinet, to maintain and create new jobs recognize the importance of assuring Vermont’s environmental heritage and ethic, and that the quality of our environment will support the goals of the
Jobs Cabinet, and that a strengthened economy will benefit the State’s ability to protect the environment.

14) Advise the Governor on the effectiveness of this Order on job creation and retention in Vermont.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Executive Order 01-00 is hereby revoked and rescinded.

Dated April 11, 2003.

Executive Order No. 3-45
(No. 10-03) [Executive Code of Ethics.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 09-11 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-53), dated July 21, 2011.

Executive Order No. 3-46
(No. 06-05) [Rescinding Certain Executive Orders.

WHEREAS, the Governor has the power under 3 V.S.A., chapter 41 to alter the organization of the Executive Branch through use of the Executive Order; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order has been used over the years for a variety of purposes, including the creation of certain boards, councils and commissions, and the reorganization of the Executive Branch; and

WHEREAS, these orders are of continuous effect unless expressly limited in duration, or revoked, rescinded or superseded; and

WHEREAS, certain executive orders are either no longer useful, no longer effective, or have been superseded by legislative enactment, and yet remain in existence.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby revoke and rescind the following Executive Orders:

Executive Order #3-1 (formerly 13-69) dated October 17, 1969 (Planning & Community Service Agency);

Executive Order #3-4 (formerly 21-78) dated August 25, 1978 (Transfer of Utility Driver Position from Agency of Human Services to Purchasing Division, Agency of Administration);

Executive Order #3-5 (formerly 32-79) dated July 2, 1979 (Transfer of Clerk B Position from Office of Secretary of State to Division of Public Records, Agency of Administration);

Executive Order #3-10 (formerly 20-86) dated April 10, 1986 (Governor’s Commission on Women);

Executive Order #3-11 (formerly 35-87) dated August 6, 1987 (Abolition of Certain Departments and Divisions and Establishment of the Department of General Services and Department of Finance & Management);

Executive Order #3-12 (formerly 36-87) dated January 14, 1987 (Transfer of Certain Positions and Appropriations from Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Water Resources to Department of Labor & Industry);

Executive Order #3-13 (formerly 45-87) dated July 7, 1987 (Transfer of Certain Positions, Functions and Appropriations of Certain Agencies and the Central Support Services Revolving Fund to Department of General Services);

Executive Order #3-16 (formerly 1-91) dated January 15, 1991 (Transfer of Duties and Director of Office of Economic Opportunity From Agency of Human Services to Department of Prevention, Assistance, Transition, and Health Access);

Executive Order #3-17 (formerly 2-91) dated January 15, 1991 (Transfer of Duties Relating to Public Drinking Water Program and Positions and Equipment of Division of Environmental Health from Department of Health to Department of Environmental Conservation);

Executive Order #3-22 (formerly 3A-92) dated June 15, 1992 (Recognition, Structure and Powers of Vermont Center for Geographic Information and Transfer of Functions from Geographic Information Services);

Executive Order #3-28 (formerly 11-94) dated October 20, 1994 (Reimbursement for Members of the Governor’s Commission on Women);

Executive Order #10-1 (formerly 25-70) dated June 1, 1970 (Environmental Conservation Agency);

Executive Order #10-2 (formerly 26-70) dated July 1, 1970 (Transfer of Functions Relating to Water Pollution, Air Pollution, Radiation Pollution, Waste Disposal and Granting Permits to Environmental Conservation Agency);

Executive Order #10-3 (formerly 29-71) dated January 14, 1971 (Transfer of Tourist Information and Outdoor Advertising Functions to Agency of Development and Community Affairs);

Executive Order #10-4 (formerly 34-71) dated April 15, 1971 (Transfer of Funds to Agency of Development and Community Affairs);

Executive Order #10-5 (formerly 43-71) dated October 6, 1971 (Transfer of Functions Relating to Industrial Hygiene and Ionizing Radiation to Department of Health);

Executive Order #10-6 (formerly 10a-77) dated September 27, 1977 (Transfer of Duties and Functions of Division of Outdoor Advertising);

Executive Order #10-7 (formerly 61-81) dated August 26, 1981 (Transfer of Division of Protection, Agency of Environmental Conservation to Department of Water Resources and Environmental Engineering);

Executive Order #10-11 (formerly 71-89) dated January 13, 1989 (Transfer of Authority to Administer Solid Waste Grant Programs from Secretary of Development and Community Affairs to Secretary of Natural Resources);

Executive Order #10-12 (formerly 84-90) dated January 22, 1990 (Designation of Department of Environmental Conservation and Department of Housing And Community Affairs as Agencies to Administer 10 V.S.A. Chapter 153);

Executive Order #16-1 (formerly 11-93) dated October 14, 1993 (Identification of Vermont Higher Education Council as Postsecondary Review Entity);

Executive Order #16-3 (formerly 13-94) dated November 21, 1994 (Vermont Goals 2000 Commission);

Executive Order #17-1 (formerly 21-86) dated April 17, 1986 (Provision of Nonpartisan Voter Registration Services by State Agencies);

Executive Order #18-5 (formerly 14-91) dated November 26, 1991 (Rabies Task Force);

Executive Order #18-8 (formerly 03-94) dated February 9, 1994 (Drug Policy Cabinet);

Executive Order #19-1 (formerly 12-91) dated November 21, 1991 (Functions of Division of Planning, Agency of Transportation;

Executive Order #19-2 (formerly 04-94) dated April 6, 1994 (Designation of Agency of Transportation as Administrator of the Highway Safety Program);

Executive Order #20-4 (formerly 58-88) dated January 29, 1988 (Veterans’ Advisory Council);

Executive Order #21-1 (formerly 36-70) dated September 1, 1970 (Transfer of Funds and Responsibilities for Program of Day Care Services for Children of Working Mothers and Guardians);

Executive Order #21-2 (formerly 55-81) dated January 13, 1981 (Administration of Comprehensive Employment and Training Office);

Executive Order #21-3 (formerly 4-85) dated April 18, 1985 (Wage Rates on Rouse’s Point Bridge Project);

Executive Order #21-4 (formerly 02-93) dated January 21, 1993 (Governor’s Advisory Council on Workers’ Compensation);

Executive Order #21-7 (formerly 06-01) dated September 21, 2001 (Transfer of the Division of Occupational Health from the Department of Health to the Department of Labor and Industry);

Executive Order #23-1 (formerly 20-70) dated April 27, 1970 (Truck Permit Section);

Executive Order #30-1 (formerly 30-76) dated May 12, 1976 (Department of Bus, Rail, Waterways and Motor Carrier Services);

Executive Order #33-1 (formerly 3-73) dated January 12, 1973 (Cash Recipients of Social Services);

Executive Order #33-2 (formerly 2-77) dated January 14, 1977 (Licensing & Regulation Division, Human Services Agency);

Executive Order #33-3 (formerly 19-78) dated June 30, 1978 (Positions Transferred to Agency of Human Services);

Executive Order #33-4 (formerly 28-79) dated March 2, 1979 (Work Incentive Program);

Executive Order #33-5 (formerly 33-79) dated July 2, 1979 (Transfer of Typist C Position from Secretary of State to Division of Vital Statistics, Department of Health, Agency of Human Services);

Executive Order #33-6 (formerly 40-79) dated September 28, 1979 (Transfer of Van, Utility Driver and Mail Clerk A from Agency of Administration, Division of Purchasing, to Agency of Human Services, Central Office);

Executive Order #33-8 (formerly 48-87) dated July 17, 1987 (Vermont Housing Roundtable).

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated September 13, 2005.